Maryland, session 2025, HB0941.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Education
15–140.
(A) IN THIS SECTION, “UMES” MEANS THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND
EASTERN SHORE.
(B) (1) THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FINDS THAT IN ACCORDANCE WITH THE
LETTER ISSUED TO THE GOVERNOR JOINTLY FROM THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb0941*

HOUSE BILL 941
EDUCATION AND THE U.S. DEPARTMENT OF AGRICULTURE, DATED SEPTEMBER 18,
2023:
(I) THE SECOND MORRILL ACT OF 1890 REQUIRED STATES
CHOOSING TO OPEN A SECOND LAND–GRANT INSTITUTION FOR BLACK STUDENTS
TO PROVIDE AN EQUITABLE DISTRIBUTION OF FUNDS BETWEEN 1862 AND 1890
LAND–GRANT INSTITUTIONS;
(II) A FUNDING DISPARITY EXISTED FROM 1987 THROUGH 2020
BETWEEN UMES, THE STATE’S 1890 LAND–GRANT INSTITUTION, AND THE
UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS, THE STATE’S 1862
LAND–GRANT INSTITUTION;
(III) IF UMES RECEIVED THE SAME LEVEL OF STATE FUNDING
PER STUDENT AS THE UNIVERSITY OF MARYLAND, COLLEGE PARK CAMPUS FROM
1987 THROUGH 2020, AN ADDITIONAL $321,181,312 WOULD HAVE BEEN AVAILABLE
FOR UMES; AND
(IV) THE FUNDING PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION SHALL
REMEDY THE FUNDING DISPARITY DESCRIBED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION.
(2) IT IS THE INTENT OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY THAT THE
FUNDING PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION BE APPROPRIATED EACH FISCAL YEAR IN
A MANNER THAT REMEDIES THE FUNDING DISPARITY AS SOON AS PRACTICABLE.
(C) (1) FOR FISCAL YEAR 2027 AND EACH FISCAL YEAR THEREAFTER,
THE GOVERNOR SHALL INCLUDE IN THE ANNUAL BUDGET BILL AN APPROPRIATION
OF AT LEAST $5,000,000 TO UMES.
(2) FOR ANY FISCAL YEAR, THE AMOUNT APPROPRIATED TO UMES
UNDER THIS SUBSECTION MAY NOT BE LESS THAN THE AMOUNT APPROPRIATED IN
THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
(3) FUNDS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL BE:
(I) APPROPRIATED EACH FISCAL YEAR UNTIL A TOTAL
AMOUNT OF $321,181,312 IS APPROPRIATED TO UMES; AND
(II) SUPPLEMENTAL TO, AND MAY NOT SUPPLANT, FUNDS
APPROPRIATED TO UMES IN THE STATE BUDGET.
(D) FUNDS PROVIDED UNDER THIS SECTION MAY BE USED FOR:

HOUSE BILL 941 3
(1) DEVELOPMENT OF INFRASTRUCTURE AND ACADEMIC
PROGRAMS;
(2) INVESTMENT IN FACULTY;
(3) SCHOLARSHIPS; AND
(4) ANY OTHER INSTITUTIONAL NEED IDENTIFIED BY UMES.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2025.